lib/dict/lv_LV.aff
SFX % Y 276
SFX %   0   oða      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðâ      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðai     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðais    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðajâ    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðajai   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðajam   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðajâm   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðajâs   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðajiem  [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðajos   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðam     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðâm     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðas     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðâs     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oði      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðie     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðiem    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðo      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðos     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðs      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðu      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oðus     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ams      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ama      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amâ      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amai     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amais    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajâ    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajai   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajam   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajâm   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajâs   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajiem  [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajos   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amam     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amâm     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amas     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amâs     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ami      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amie     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amiem    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amo      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amos     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amu      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amus     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oða      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðâ      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðai     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðais    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðajâ    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðajai   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðajam   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðajâm   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðajâs   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðajiem  [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðajos   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðam     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðâm     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðas     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðâs     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oði      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðie     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðiem    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðo      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðos     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðs      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðu      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   oðus     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   ams      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   ama      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amâ      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amai     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amais    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajâ    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajai   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajam   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajâm   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajâs   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajiem  [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amajos   [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amam     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amâm     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amas     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amâs     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   ami      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amie     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amiem    [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amo      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amos     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amu      [^âç][r]t
SFX %   0   amus     [^âç][r]t
SFX %   gt   dzoða      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðâ      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðai     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðais    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðajâ    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðajai   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðajam   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðajâm   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðajâs   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðajiem  [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðajos   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðam     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðâm     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðas     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðâs     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoði      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðie     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðiem    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðo      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðos     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðs      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðu      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoðus     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzams      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzama      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamâ      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamai     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamais    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajâ    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajai   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajam   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajâm   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajâs   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajiem  [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajos   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamam     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamâm     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamas     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamâs     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzami      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamie     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamiem    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamo      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamos     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamu      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamus     [g]t
SFX %   kt   coða      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðâ      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðai     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðais    [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðajâ    [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðajai   [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðajam   [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðajâm   [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðajâs   [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðajiem  [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðajos   [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðam     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðâm     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðas     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðâs     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coði      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðie     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðiem    [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðo      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðos     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðs      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðu      [k]t
SFX %   kt   coðus     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cams      [k]t
SFX %   kt   cama      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camâ      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camai     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camais    [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajâ    [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajai   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajam   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajâm   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajâs   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajiem  [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajos   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camam     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camâm     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camas     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camâs     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cami      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camie     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camiem    [k]t
SFX %   kt   camo      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camos     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camu      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camus     [k]t
SFX %   ârt   aroða      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðâ      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðai     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðais    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðajâ    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðajai   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðajam   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðajâm   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðajâs   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðajiem  [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðajos   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðam     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðâm     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðas     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðâs     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroði      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðie     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðiem    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðo      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðos     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðs      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðu      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aroðus     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   arams      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   arama      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramâ      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramai     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramais    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajâ    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajai   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajam   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajâm   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajâs   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajiem  [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramajos   [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramam     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramâm     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramas     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramâs     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   arami      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramie     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramiem    [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramo      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramos     [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramu      [â]rt
SFX %   ârt   aramus     [â]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroða      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðâ      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðai     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðais    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðajâ    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðajai   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðajam   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðajâm   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðajâs   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðajiem  [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðajos   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðam     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðâm     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðas     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðâs     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroði      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðie     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðiem    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðo      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðos     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðs      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðu      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eroðus     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   erams      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   erama      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramâ      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramai     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramais    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajâ    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajai   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajam   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajâm   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajâs   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajiem  [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramajos   [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramam     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramâm     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramas     [ç]rt
