lib/dict/lv_LV.dic
aizbraukt/I+%B596
aizdiegt/IJ9%MB56
aizdûkt/+5BI9%6
aizjûgt/+d]IB5%96[
aizklimst/+IB%J74N
aizkârt/[+e%Bd6T4I]
aizlenkt/+9%IB65
aizliekt/dBJ9[I%65M]
aizlûst/%+J7
aizpaist/%+IFJeM47
aizrûkt/I+%9B56
aizsegt/+d96%BI5[]
aizslaukt/+B%9I65
aizsniegt/+Id%[9B65]
aizsteigt/+I%9[dB5]6
aiztrenkt/I+9%]Bd65[
aizurgt/+9B%6I5
aizíçrkt/+9I%B65
aizğmaukt/IB+%695
aizğïâkt/69+I%B5
aizğïûkt/+%I965B
apbçrt/d%+6T4BIe[]
apdziest/+%
apgulgt/+B9I%65
apjçgt/5IB+9%d6[]
apkaukt/J9%dBI5[]6M
apklimst/%I7+BNJ4
apklîst/+%bJENI7
apkrâkt/+I%5B96
apkviekt/%+I96B5
aplekt/9+%B560
aplûst/+%J7
apmiegt/JB9I6%M5
apmît/J%+I954B[8dM]
applûkt/+%9IB65
apraukt/+%9I6B5
aprûkt/+9%6IB5
apsaukt/BI%+965
apsit/%J+]0
apspiegt/+%BI956
apspurgt/+%65IB9
apsveikt/+%I9B65
apsçst/%I+bJ7]EN[
aptriekt/9+%I6B5
apvîst/%+J7B4N
apğíîst/I+%EJbN7
apğòâkt/69+IB%5
ataust/+I7M%eJF
atdiegt/I+%B956
atgârgt/9+BI5%6
atkaukt/+%5B69I
atkraukt/+9IB%65
atkûst/%+
atmaukt/I%5B+96
atplûkt/9+J%IB6M5
atrûkt/B%9+65IJM
atskârst/%+4BJIN
atspriegt/I9+%B65
atsvçrt/+%IeB64
atsût/+%0
aturgt/+%IB569
atíçrkt/9+B%6I5
atòirgt/d%96+IB5[]
blîst/%I+Jb7NE
bçrt/+de%T[6IB]4
dîkt/+J95I%B6M
gârgt/%+9BI65JM
iebçrt/+%eBI64
iegulgt/J%IM9B65
iejûgt/+BdI%5[96]
iekaukt/%9+[6IBd5]
iekraukt/9+6%BId[]5
iekûst/+%
ielûst/+%J7
iemît/&J%+BI89dM[54]
ieplûkt/%9IB+65
ierûkt/+I[%dB9M5J]6
ieslaukt/9%+I6B5
iespurgt/+I%dB]95[6
iesçkt/IB69%+d[]5
iesûkt/+%96][IdB5
ietrenkt/5%+I96[Bd]
ievçrt/%+eI6B4
ieğalkt/+9%I56B[d]
ieğïûkt/9I+%MJh(8
ieşòaugt/d9%JMI6B5[]
izbrçkt/+[I9dB%6]5
izdûkt/+I]%69Bd[5
izjaukt/+9Bd6I%[]5
izkliegt/+9IBd%5]6[
izkrâkt/d%+9IB5[]6
izkûst/%+
izmiegt/I%+B956
izplîst/+eF%I7JM
izrçkt/IB+%d69[]5
izsit/%+0J]
izspiegt/MIB5J]9d6%[
izsîkt/J]95I%B[dM6
iztriekt/J%9MdIB]56[
izvâkt/%+9dI6[5B]
izğïâkt/+%5B6Id9[]
izòirgt/+[d%9I65B]
jçgt/+5IB9%Md6[]J
kaukt/BI5+9[d%JM6]
krimst/I%B4+J7N
kûst/%+
lûgt/%+IdB59M6]J[
mâkt/+%dB59I[]6
neaizdiegt/%9B
neiemiegt/%[9dB]
neizspiegt/9%]d[B
nepaşòaugt/%9B
nesastrçgt/%9B
nobeigt/9%+I[dB56]
nobârt/+eI%B46
nodûkt/%+Bd6]I9[5
noirgt/+9B6d[%I5]
nokaist/+I7%FeJM4
noklimst/I7+J%B4N
nokurkt/J6I[%5BdM]
nolekt/%9+B650
nomaukt/5BI+d[9%]6
nopaist/+%eIJ74FM
nopçrt/+Id4TB%e][6
nosegt/+I9[Bd%]56
noslçgt/+Id%95B[]6
nostrçgt/9+%I6B5
nosçst/%IJb]+7E[N
notraukt/5+I%d[9]B6
noveikt/+%9IB65
noğalkt/%9+6[dBI5]
noğòaukt/[%I+d9]B65
noşòaugt/d+6%9BI5][
pabrçkt/%+I9B65
padziest/%+
pagârgt/9+%B6I5
pakalst/+IN7%JB4
paklimst/+IB%7JN4
pakurkt/I%+5B6
palekt/dB+%956][0
pamçrkt/+I9%B65
paplûst/+b%IE7JN
parûkt/+%96IB5
paslaukt/+9I%B65
paspurgt/%+69BI5
pasçkt/IB+569%
pateikt/69I+B%d][5
patumst/+%eI7F
pavçrt/d+%IT6e[]4B
pağmaukt/+%IB569
pağòaukt/%I+9B56
paşòaugt/9%JMI6B5
piebraukt/+%B9I65
piediegt/%+9IB56
piejaukt/9+B%6I5
piekaukt/I9B5%+6
piekraukt/%B+9I65
piekûst/%+
piemaukt/B+6%9I5
piepaist/e+FI%74
pierûkt/%+96I5B
piesit/+%J0]
piesprûst/b+%NIJE7
piesvîst/%+JEbI7N
piesûkt/+I9%6d5B[]
pietrenkt/+%5dBI][96
pievâkt/+%56BI9
pieğalkt/+I%B965
pieğïûkt/+%I95B6
pieşmiegt/5+%9I6B
plûkt/MJ%9I+Bd5[8]6
pârbriest/+I%EJb7N
pârdîkt/+%[dBI9]56
pârkalst/B%+JIN74
pârklimst/+%JINB47
pârkurkt/+%Bd6I[5]
pârliekt/+9%Bd6I][5
pârmâkt/69%+BI5
pârplûkt/I+%9B56
pârrûkt/%+dB[I9]65
pârslaukt/+%9I6B5
pârspurgt/%+9dI[65B]
pârsûkt/+%Id[9B]65
pârtriekt/+I9[6%dB]5
pârvçrt/%+eI4B6]
pârğalkt/+%9IB65
pârğïûkt/%I9+M8J
pârşmiegt/5+I%d[96B]
rçkt/+IB69%dJ]M[5
sablîst/+%I7NbJE
sabârt/%+eT6]BdI[4
sajçgt/+%5IB96
sakaukt/B5I+%69d[]
sakârt/6e+%]4TBdI[
salûgt/I%B+956
samulst/+JFI7%Me
saplûkt/+%Id96JBM5[]
saraukt/+%BI69[d5]
sasegt/I+%9dB65][
sasniegt/+I%9B56
saspurgt/B%+95I6
sasvîst/b+I%7ENJ
satraukt/%9+I][dB56
saveikt/+BI%965
sazviegt/%6+5BI9d[]
sağíîst/+%IbJN7E
sağòâkt/+d9%6BI[]5
segt/+%MI9d[]JB56
sniegt/+9%IBd56M[J]
sprûst/+JEbI%7N
sveikt/%+9IB56MJ
sçrt/e%+IB4
sût/%+0
tumst/+F%eIJM7
uzbraukt/+%I9B65
uzdiegt/+%9B6I5
uzkaukt/9%+BI65
uzkraukt/+%9I6B5
uzkârt/%+IdeT]B6[4
uzlûgt/+%IB596
uzrçkt/IB69%+5
uzsegt/Bd+9[I%]56
uzspurgt/B%9+I65
uzsçst/%I+Jb]EN[7
uzteikt/B+%59I6
uzveikt/I+95B6%
uzíçrkt/+9%BI65
uzğïûkt/9+I8%MJ
uzòirgt/%+96IB5
vâkt/+%dB59MI[]J6
íçrkt/%IBd+9J6M5[]
ğíîst/%+IJb7NE
ğòâkt/+69[BId%J]M5
